Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-2651
Fines; distribution and collection.

(1) All money collected as a civil or an administrative fine shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for distribution in accordance with Article VII, section 5, of the Constitution of Nebraska.

(2) Any civil or administrative fine which remains unpaid for more than sixty days shall constitute a debt to the State of Nebraska which may be collected by lien foreclosure or sued for and recovered in any proper forum of action in the name of the State of Nebraska in the district court of the county in which the violator resides or owns property.

Laws 1993, LB 588, § 30;

Laws 2006, LB 874, § 14.